Illinois, session 104th, HB5810.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Public Aid Code is amended by 5changing Section 5-5.01a as follows: 6    (305 ILCS 5/5-5.01a)7    Sec. 5-5.01a. Supportive living facilities program. 8    (a) The Department shall establish and provide oversight 9for a program of supportive living facilities that seek to 10promote resident independence, dignity, respect, and 11well-being in the most cost-effective manner.12    A supportive living facility is (i) a free-standing 13facility or (ii) a distinct physical and operational entity 14within a mixed-use building that meets the criteria 15established in subsection (d). A supportive living facility 16integrates housing with health, personal care, and supportive 17services and is a designated setting that offers residents 18their own separate, private, and distinct living units.19     Sites for the operation of the program shall be selected 20by the Department based upon criteria that may include the 21need for services in a geographic area, the availability of 22funding, and the site's ability to meet the standards. 23    Services provided by supportive living facilities shall   HB5810- 2 -LRB104 22491 KTG 38936 b1include the provision of basic hygiene products necessary for 2residents to meet required hygiene standards. "Basic hygiene 3products" shall include, but not be limited to: (i) soap; (ii) 4shampoo; (iii) toothpaste and toothbrushes; (iv) deodorant; 5(v) toilet paper; (vi) skin care products necessary to 6maintain health; (vii) incontinence supplies when medically or 7functionally indicated; (viii) a bath mat for the tub or 8shower; (ix) a set of towels; and (x) a set of linen bed 9sheets. Basic hygiene products shall be provided by the 10supportive living facility and included in the monthly rate 11paid under the program. Residents shall not be required to 12purchase basic hygiene products from their personal needs 13allowance. 14    Each supportive living facility may, subject to 15appropriation, provide residents with meals that shall be 16nutritionally adequate, appropriate to the resident's needs, 17and sufficient in quantity and quality to maintain overall 18health. The Department may establish a minimum per-resident 19daily meal expenditure. Beginning the next January 1 following 20the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 104th General 21Assembly, and each January 1, thereafter, the minimum 22expenditure shall be automatically adjusted based on the 23Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers (CPI-U) for the 24Midwest Region, as published by the United States Department 25of Labor.26    As stated in the supportive living program home and   HB5810- 3 -LRB104 22491 KTG 38936 b1community-based service waiver approved by the federal Centers 2for Medicare and Medicaid Services beginning on July 1, 2025, 3the Department shall maintain the rate add-on implemented on 4January 1, 2023, for the provision of 2 meals per day at no 5less than $6.15 per day.6    Nothing in this amendatory Act of the 104th General 7Assembly may be construed to require residents to supplement 8basic meals using their personal needs allowance.9    The Department may periodically adjust the per diem rate 10for meals to reflect changes in food costs and economic 11conditions, subject to appropriation.12    (b) Beginning July 1, 2014, subject to federal approval, 13the Medicaid rates for supportive living facilities shall be 14equal to the supportive living facility Medicaid rate 15effective on June 30, 2014 increased by 8.85%. Once the 16assessment imposed at Article V-G of this Code is determined 17to be a permissible tax under Title XIX of the Social Security 18Act, the Department shall increase the Medicaid rates for 19supportive living facilities effective on July 1, 2014 by 209.09%. The Department shall apply this increase retroactively 21to coincide with the imposition of the assessment in Article 22V-G of this Code in accordance with the approval for federal 23financial participation by the Centers for Medicare and 24Medicaid Services. 25    The Medicaid rates for supportive living facilities 26effective on July 1, 2017 must be equal to the rates in effect   HB5810- 4 -LRB104 22491 KTG 38936 b1for supportive living facilities on June 30, 2017 increased by 22.8%. 3    The Medicaid rates for supportive living facilities 4effective on July 1, 2018 must be equal to the rates in effect 5for supportive living facilities on June 30, 2018. 6    Subject to federal approval, the Medicaid rates for 7supportive living services on and after July 1, 2019 must be at 8least 54.3% of the average total nursing facility services per 9diem for the geographic areas defined by the Department while 10maintaining the rate differential for dementia care and must 11be updated whenever the total nursing facility service per 12diems are updated. Beginning July 1, 2022, upon the 13implementation of the Patient Driven Payment Model, Medicaid 14rates for supportive living services must be at least 54.3% of 15the average total nursing services per diem rate for the 16geographic areas. For purposes of this provision, the average 17total nursing services per diem rate shall include all add-ons 18for nursing facilities for the geographic area provided for in 19Section 5-5.2. The rate differential for dementia care must be 20maintained in these rates and the rates shall be updated 21whenever nursing facility per diem rates are updated. 22    Subject to federal approval, beginning January 1, 2024, 23the dementia care rate for supportive living services must be 24no less than the non-dementia care supportive living services 25rate multiplied by 1.5. 26    (b-5) Subject to federal approval, beginning January 1,   HB5810- 5 -LRB104 22491 KTG 38936 b12025, Medicaid rates for supportive living services must be at 2least 54.75% of the average total nursing facility per diem 3rate for the geographic areas defined by the Department and 4shall include all add-ons for nursing facilities for the 5geographic area provided for in Section 5-5.2. 6    (c) The Department may adopt rules to implement this 7Section. Rules that establish or modify the services, 8standards, and conditions for participation in the program 9shall be adopted by the Department in consultation with the 10Department on Aging, the Department of Rehabilitation 11Services, and the Department of Mental Health and 12Developmental Disabilities (or their successor agencies).13    (d) Subject to federal approval by the Centers for 14Medicare and Medicaid Services, the Department shall accept 15for consideration of certification under the program any 16application for a site or building where distinct parts of the 17site or building are designated for purposes other than the 18provision of supportive living services, but only if: 19        (1) those distinct parts of the site or building are 20    not designated for the purpose of providing assisted 21    living services as required under the Assisted Living and 22    Shared Housing Act; 23        (2) those distinct parts of the site or building are 24    completely separate from the part of the building used for 25    the provision of supportive living program services, 26    including separate entrances;   HB5810- 6 -LRB104 22491 KTG 38936 b1        (3) those distinct parts of the site or building do 2    not share any common spaces with the part of the building 3    used for the provision of supportive living program 4    services; and 5        (4) those distinct parts of the site or building do 6    not share staffing with the part of the building used for 7    the provision of supportive living program services. 8    (e) Facilities or distinct parts of facilities which are 9selected as supportive living facilities and are in good 10standing with the Department's rules are exempt from the 11provisions of the Nursing Home Care Act and the Illinois 12Health Facilities Planning Act.13    (f) Section 9817 of the American Rescue Plan Act of 2021 14(Public Law 117-2) authorizes a 10% enhanced federal medical 15assistance percentage for supportive living services for a 1612-month period from April 1, 2021 through March 31, 2022. 17Subject to federal approval, including the approval of any 18necessary waiver amendments or other federally required 19documents or assurances, for a 12-month period the Department 20must pay a supplemental $26 per diem rate to all supportive 21living facilities with the additional federal financial 22participation funds that result from the enhanced federal 23medical assistance percentage from April 1, 2021 through March 2431, 2022. The Department may issue parameters around how the 25supplemental payment should be spent, including quality 26improvement activities. The Department may alter the form,   HB5810- 7 -LRB104 22491 KTG 38936 b1methods, or timeframes concerning the supplemental per diem 2rate to comply with any subsequent changes to federal law, 3changes made by guidance issued by the federal Centers for 4Medicare and Medicaid Services, or other changes necessary to 5receive the enhanced federal medical assistance percentage. 6    (g) All applications for the expansion of supportive 7living dementia care settings involving sites not approved by 8the Department by January 1, 2024 may allow new elderly 9non-dementia units in addition to new dementia care units. The 10Department may approve such applications only if the 11application has: (1) no more than one non-dementia care unit 12for each dementia care unit and (2) the site is not located 13within 4 miles of an existing supportive living program site 14in Cook County (including the City of Chicago), not located 15within 12 miles of an existing supportive living program site 16in Alexander, Bond, Boone, Calhoun, Champaign, Clinton, 17DeKalb, DuPage, Fulton, Grundy, Henry, Jackson, Jersey, 18Johnson, Kane, Kankakee, Kendall, Lake, Macon, Macoupin, 19Madison, Marshall, McHenry, McLean, Menard, Mercer, Monroe, 20Peoria, Piatt, Rock Island, Sangamon, Stark, St. Clair, 21Tazewell, Vermilion, Will, Williamson, Winnebago, or Woodford 22counties, or not located within 25 miles of an existing 23supportive living program site in any other county. 24    (h) Beginning January 1, 2025, subject to federal 25approval, for a person who is a resident of a supportive living 26facility under this Section, the monthly personal needs   HB5810- 8 -LRB104 22491 KTG 38936 b1allowance shall be $120 per month. 2    (i) As stated in the supportive living program home and 3community-based service waiver approved by the federal Centers 4for Medicare and Medicaid Services, and beginning July 1, 52025, the Department must maintain the rate add-on implemented 6on January 1, 2023 for the provision of 2 meals per day at no 7less than $6.15 per day. 8    (j) Subject to federal approval, the Department shall 9allow a certified medication aide to administer medication in 10a supportive living facility. For purposes of this subsection, 11"certified medication aide" means a person who has met the 12qualifications for certification under Section 79 of the 13Assisted Living and Shared Housing Act and assists with 14medication administration while under the supervision of a 15registered professional nurse as authorized by Section 50-75 16of the Nurse Practice Act. The Department may adopt rules to 17implement this subsection. 18(Source: P.A. 103-102, Article 20, Section 20-5, eff. 1-1-24; 19103-102, Article 100, Section 100-5, eff. 1-1-24; 103-593, 20Article 15, Section 15-5, eff. 6-7-24; 103-593, Article 100, 21Section 100-5, eff. 6-7-24; 103-593, Article 165, Section 22165-5, eff. 6-7-24; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-886, eff. 238-9-24; 104-9, eff. 6-16-25; 104-417, eff. 8-15-25; revised 249-12-25.)